North Carolina, session 2025, SB823.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the Highway Fund to the Department of
Transportation the sum of five million dollars ($5,000,000) in nonrecurring funds for the
2026-2027 fiscal year to be allocated to the City of Greenville for pedestrian safety
improvements.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2026.
*S823-v-1*